Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Article 6. Benefits.

Cross references. —

For effect of receipt of unemployment benefits on permanent and temporary total disability compensation payments, see AS

23.30.187

.

Collateral references. —

76 Am. Jur. 2d, Unemployment Compensation, §§ 43-201.

81 C.J.S., Social Security and Public Welfare, §§ 291-297.

Vested right of applicant for unemployment compensation in mode and manner of computing benefits in effect at time of his discharge or loss of employment. 20 ALR2d 963.

Termination of employment as a result of union action or pursuant to a union contract as “voluntary” for purposes of unemployment compensation. 90 ALR2d 835.

Right to unemployment compensation as affected by claimant’s receipt of holiday pay. 3 ALR4th 557.

Unemployment compensation as affected by vacation or payment in lieu thereof. 14 ALR4th 1175.

Discharge from employment on ground of political views or conduct as affecting right to unemployment compensation. 29 ALR4th 287.

Sec. 23.20.330.
Claims.

Claims for benefits and notices of unemployment shall be made in accordance with the regulations that the department adopts.

History.

(§ 701 ch 5 ESLA 1955)

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Sec. 23.20.335.
Notice to employees.

An employer shall post and maintain in places readily accessible to individuals in the service of the employer printed statements concerning the regulations or other matters which the department prescribes by regulation.
An employer shall supply individuals in the service of the employer with copies of the printed statements or materials relating to claims for benefits which the department prescribes by regulation.
The department shall supply the printed statements to an employer without cost.

History.

(§ 701 ch 5 ESLA 1955)

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Sec. 23.20.340.
Determination of claims.

An examiner designated by the department shall take the claim. The examiner shall take all evidence pertaining to the eligibility of the claimant and shall promptly transmit all evidence to the department. The department, or a representative designated by it for the purpose, shall, on the basis of the evidence submitted and any additional evidence it requires, make an initial determination of the claim as to whether the claimant is eligible for benefits under AS

23.20.350

and an initial determination of the weekly benefit amount and the maximum potential benefit amount.

Within one year from the date of the initial determination of the weekly benefit amount and the maximum potential benefit amount established under AS

23.20.350

, the department shall reconsider the determination or any subsequent determination under this chapter and shall issue a redetermination amending the determination if the department finds that

an error in computation or identity has been made;

additional wages or other facts pertinent to the claimant’s insured status or eligibility for benefits have become available;

the determination resulted from a nondisclosure or misrepresentation of a material fact; or

the determination resulted from a misapplication of law by the department.

The claimant shall be promptly notified of the initial determination or a subsequent redetermination and the reasons for it.

Unless the claimant is determined to be disqualified for benefits under AS

23.20.360

,

23.20.362

,

23.20.375

,

23.20.378

—

23.20.387

, or

23.20.505

, benefits shall be promptly paid in accordance with the initial determination or subsequent redetermination.

The claimant may file an appeal from an initial determination or a redetermination under (b) of this section not later than 30 days after the claimant is notified in person of the determination or redetermination or not later than 30 days after the date the determination or redetermination is mailed to the claimant’s last address of record. The period for filing an appeal may be extended for a reasonable period if the claimant shows that the application was delayed as a result of circumstances beyond the claimant’s control.

If a determination of disqualification under AS

23.20.360

,

23.20.362

,

23.20.375

,

23.20.378

—

23.20.387

, or

23.20.505

is made, the claimant shall be promptly notified of the determination and the reasons for it. The claimant and other interested parties as defined by regulations of the department may appeal the determination in the same manner prescribed in this chapter for appeals of initial determinations and redeterminations. Benefits may not be paid while a determination is being appealed for any week for which the determination of disqualification was made. However, if a decision on the appeal allows benefits to the claimant, those benefits must be paid promptly.

[Repealed, § 80 ch 9 SLA 1980.]

History.

(§ 702 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am §§ 48 — 53, 80 ch 9 SLA 1980; am §§ 6, 7 ch 115 SLA 1982; am § 17 ch 100 SLA 1989; am §§ 10, 11 ch 43 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Sec. 23.20.345.
Payment of benefits.

Benefits are payable from the fund.
All benefits shall be paid through employment offices in accordance with regulations adopted by the department.

History.

(§ 711 ch 5 ESLA 1955)

Sec. 23.20.350.
Amount of benefits.

An individual who is paid at least $2,500 in wages during the individual’s base period for employment covered by this chapter is eligible to receive benefits under this chapter if those wages were paid in at least two of the calendar quarters of the individual’s base period.

[Repealed, § 33 ch 115 SLA 1982.]

For the purpose of computing the benefits payable under this chapter, the base period wages of an insured worker shall be determined as follows:

if the insured worker is paid 90 percent or more of the worker’s wages in the calendar quarter of the worker’s base period in which the worker was paid the greatest amount of wages, the base period wages are the wages paid in the quarters of the base period other than the one in which the greatest amount of wages were paid, multiplied by 10; and

if the insured worker is paid less than 90 percent of the worker’s wages in the calendar quarter of the worker’s base period in which the worker was paid the greatest amount of wages, the base period wages are the wages paid to the worker during the base period.

(B) Base Period Wages Weekly Benefit Amount At least But less than 0 2,500 $ 0 2,500 2,750 56 2,750 3,000 58 3,000 3,250 60 3,250 3,500 62 3,500 3,750 64 3,750 4,000 66 4,000 4,250 68 4,250 4,500 70 4,500 4,750 72 4,750 5,000 74 5,000 5,250 76 5,250 5,500 78 5,500 5,750 80 5,750 6,000 82 6,000 6,250 84 6,250 6,500 86 6,500 6,750 88 6,750 7,000 90 7,000 7,250 92 7,250 7,500 94 7,500 7,750 96 7,750 8,000 98 8,000 8,250 100 8,250 8,500 102 8,500 8,750 104 8,750 9,000 106 9,000 9,250 108 9,250 9,500 110 9,500 9,750 112 9,750 10,000 114 10,000 10,250 116 10,250 10,500 118 10,500 10,750 120 10,750 11,000 122 11,000 11,250 124 11,250 11,500 126 11,500 11,750 128 11,750 12,000 130 12,000 12,250 132 12,250 12,500 134 12,500 12,750 136 12,750 13,000 138 13,000 13,250 140 13,250 13,500 142 13,500 13,750 144 13,750 14,000 146 14,000 14,250 148 14,250 14,500 150 14,500 14,750 152 14,750 15,000 154 15,000 15,250 156 15,250 15,500 158 15,500 15,750 160 15,750 16,000 162 16,000 16,250 164 16,250 16,500 166 16,500 16,750 168 16,750 17,000 170 17,000 17,250 172 17,250 17,500 174 17,500 17,750 176 17,750 18,000 178 18,000 18,250 180 18,250 18,500 182 18,500 18,750 184 18,750 19,000 186 19,000 19,250 188 19,250 19,500 190 19,500 19,750 192 19,750 20,000 194 20,000 20,250 196 20,250 20,500 198 20,500 20,750 200 20,750 21,000 202 21,000 21,250 204 21,250 21,500 206 21,500 21,750 208 21,750 22,000 210 22,000 22,250 212 22,250 22,500 214 22,500 22,750 216 22,750 23,000 218 23,000 23,250 220 23,250 23,500 222 23,500 23,750 224 23,750 24,000 226 24,000 24,250 228 24,250 24,500 230 24,500 24,750 232 24,750 25,000 234 25,000 25,250 236 25,250 25,500 238 25,500 25,750 240 25,750 26,000 242 26,000 26,250 244 26,250 26,500 246 26,500 26,750 248 26,750 27,000 250 27,000 27,250 252 27,250 27,500 254 27,500 27,750 256 27,750 28,000 258 28,000 28,250 260 28,250 28,500 262 28,500 28,750 264 28,750 29,000 266 29,000 29,250 268 29,250 29,500 270 29,500 29,750 272 29,750 30,000 274 30,000 30,250 276 30,250 30,500 278 30,500 30,750 280 30,750 31,000 282 31,000 31,250 284 31,250 31,500 286 31,500 31,750 288 31,750 32,000 290 32,000 32,250 292 32,250 32,500 294 32,500 32,750 296 32,750 33,000 298 33,000 33,250 300 33,250 33,500 302 33,500 33,750 304 33,750 34,000 306 34,000 34,250 308 34,250 34,500 310 34,500 34,750 312 34,750 35,000 314 35,000 35,250 316 35,250 35,500 318 35,500 35,750 320 35,750 36,000 322 36,000 36,250 324 36,250 36,500 326 36,500 36,750 328 36,750 37,000 330 37,000 37,250 332 37,250 37,500 334 37,500 37,750 336 37,750 38,000 338 38,000 38,250 340 38,250 38,500 342 38,500 38,750 344 38,750 39,000 346 39,000 39,250 348 39,250 39,500 350 39,500 39,750 352 39,750 40,000 354 40,000 40,250 356 40,250 40,500 358 40,500 40,750 360 40,750 41,000 362 41,000 41,250 364 41,250 41,500 366 41,500 41,750 368 41,750 42,000 370 42,000 370.

An individual who is eligible under (a) of this section is entitled to receive the weekly benefit amount set out in column (B) of the table in this subsection that is opposite the amount set out in column (A) of the individual’s base period wages determined under (c) of this section:

An individual who is eligible under (d) of this section is entitled to receive a weekly benefit under this chapter for the number of weeks set out in column (B) of the table in this subsection opposite the applicable earnings ratio of the individual set out in column (A):

An individual who establishes a benefit year is eligible for an allowance for dependents in addition to the individual’s weekly benefit amount. The department may require an individual claiming or receiving an allowance for dependents to produce income tax returns, birth certificates, notices of adoption or custody, social security account number of spouse, verification of support documents, or other information necessary to verify that the allowance is payable to the individual. The allowance for dependents

is $24 per week for each dependent, except that the total allowance for dependents paid to an individual may not exceed $72 for each week of unemployment;

is payable beginning with the week during the benefit year in which the individual claims an allowance for the dependent and is payable for the remainder of the individual’s eligibility for regular, extended, or supplemental payments during the benefit year;

may not be claimed for a new dependent after the end of the benefit year or after the exhaustion of regular benefits in the benefit year;

[Repealed, § 30 ch 100 SLA 1989.]

[Repealed, § 30 ch 100 SLA 1989.]

In this section,

“dependent” means an individual’s

unmarried child, stepchild, legally adopted child, or legal ward under 18 years of age who is

lawfully in the individual’s physical custody at the time the individual claims the allowance for dependents; or

dependent on the individual for more than 50 percent of support;

unmarried child, stepchild, legally adopted child, or legal ward of any age who is dependent on the individual for more than 50 percent of support and who is prevented by infirmity from engaging in a gainful occupation;

“earnings ratio” means the ratio obtained by dividing the total base period wages of the insured worker by the wages paid in the quarter of the base period in which the worker was paid the greatest amount of wages.

Click to view

(A) (B)
Earnings Ratio Number of Weeks
less than 1.50 16
1.50-1.99 18
2.00-2.49 20
2.50-2.99 22
3.00-3.49 24
3.50 or more 26

Click to view

History.

(§ 712(a) — (d) ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 25 ch 169 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 112 SLA 1966; am §§ 9, 10 ch 106 SLA 1969; am § 7 ch 106 SLA 1971; am § 10 ch 43 SLA 1973; am § 54 ch 9 SLA 1980; am §§ 8, 33 ch 115 SLA 1982; am §§ 6 — 8 ch 106 SLA 1984; am § 26 ch 85 SLA 1988; am § 30 ch 100 SLA 1989; am § 1 ch 167 SLA 1990; am § 5 ch 116 SLA 1996; am §§ 11, 12 ch 45 SLA 2008)

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Sec. 23.20.352.
Additional benefits. [Repealed, § 32 ch 32 SLA 1971.]

Sec. 23.20.353.
Supplemental state benefits.

An individual is eligible to receive supplemental state benefits for a week in which

the individual is an “exhaustee” as defined in AS

23.20.409

;

the individual has otherwise satisfied the requirements of this chapter for the receipt of regular benefits; and

the individual is ineligible for extended benefits solely because of the provisions of AS

23.20.406(k)

.

Supplemental state benefits are paid in the same amounts, for the same periods, and under the same conditions as extended benefits under AS

23.20.406(a)

— (j) and (l) and AS

23.20.407

—

23.20.409

.

[Repealed, § 9 ch 28 SLA 1993.]

History.

(§ 9 ch 115 SLA 1982; am § 2 ch 28 SLA 1993)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1996, in (a)(3) of this section, “AS

23.20.406(k)

” was substituted for “AS

23.20.406

(

l

)” and in (b), “AS

23.20.406(a)

— (j) and (

l

)” was substituted for “AS

23.20.406(a)

— (k)” to reflect the 1996 relettering of AS

23.20.406(k)

and (

l

).

Sec. 23.20.354.
State interim benefits.

There is established a state interim benefits program. State interim benefits are payable only to the extent that money is appropriated from the general fund for that purpose.

An individual who has otherwise satisfied the requirements of this chapter for the receipt of regular benefits is eligible for state interim benefits if

the individual’s weekly benefit amount payable under this chapter is reduced or denied under AS

23.20.381(h)

; or

the individual is a noncertificated individual who provides compensated service to a school district for teaching indigenous languages and the individual’s weekly benefit amount payable under this chapter is reduced or denied under AS

23.20.381(e)

.

The amount of state interim benefits payable to an individual for a week is equal to the difference between the individual’s weekly benefit amount, including the dependents allowance, established under AS

23.20.350

and the individual’s weekly benefit amount, including the dependents allowance, payable for that week under AS

23.20.381(e)

or

23.20.381(h)

. The total amount of state interim benefits paid may not exceed the total amount of regular benefits denied solely under AS

23.20.381(e)

or

23.20.381(h)

.

State interim benefits are subject to reduction, disqualification, recoupment, and offset in the same manner as regular benefits under this chapter.

Extended, additional, or supplemental benefits of any kind are not payable on the basis of a claim for, or the payment of, state interim benefits. State interim benefits may not be used to supplement a reduction or denial of extended, additional, or supplemental benefits.

History.

(§ 9 ch. 106 SLA 1984)

Sec. 23.20.355.
Interstate payment restrictions. [Repealed, § 8 ch 106 SLA 1971.]

Sec. 23.20.360.
Earnings deducted from weekly benefit amount.

The amount of benefits, excluding the allowance for dependents, payable to an insured worker for a week of unemployment shall be reduced by 75 percent of the wages payable to the insured worker for that week that are in excess of $50. However, the amount of benefits may not be reduced below zero. If the benefit is not a multiple of $1, it is computed to the next higher multiple of $1.
If the benefit is zero, no allowance for dependents is payable.

History.

(§ 713 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 26 ch 169 SLA 1957; am § 55 ch 9 SLA 1980; am § 10 ch 115 SLA 1982)

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Sec. 23.20.362.
Disqualifying or deductible income.

The amount of benefits payable to an insured worker for a week of unemployment which begins in a period for which the insured worker receives a pension, retirement or retired pay, annuity, or similar periodic payment that is based on the previous work of the insured worker shall be reduced by the amount of the payment that is attributable to that week. The requirements of this subsection apply only if

the pension, retirement or retired pay, annuity, or similar periodic payment is provided under a plan maintained or contributed to by an employer of the insured worker during the base period of the insured worker; and

for a periodic payment other than a payment made under the Social Security Act, the Railroad Retirement Act of 1974, or earlier versions of those federal laws, the service performed for an employer by an insured worker after the beginning of the base period or remuneration for those services affects eligibility for, or increases the amount of the pension, retirement or retired pay, annuity, or similar periodic payment.

The reduction of benefits provided in (a) of this section does not apply to that part, if any, of a pension, retirement or retired pay, annuity, or similar periodic payment that is attributable to contributions of the insured worker.

The amount of benefits payable to an insured worker for a week of unemployment shall be reduced by the amount of any severance or termination payment, wages in lieu of dismissal notice, or payment for vacation, sick leave, or holidays that is attributable to that week.

An individual is not entitled to benefits for a week of unemployment for which the individual has received or is seeking unemployment benefits under another employment security law in a manner other than in accordance with the reciprocal arrangements with other states or the federal government. This subsection does not apply if the appropriate agency finally determines that the individual is not entitled to benefits under the other law.

If, after a reduction of the benefit amount under (a) or (c) of this section, the weekly benefit amount is not a multiple of $1, the benefit amount shall be increased to the next higher multiple of $1.

History.

(§ 56 ch 9 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 145 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 114 SLA 1981; § 10 ch 106 SLA 1984)

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Sec. 23.20.365.
Limited liability of state.

Benefits are considered due and payable under this chapter only to the extent provided in this chapter and to the extent that money is available for them to the credit of the unemployment fund, and the liability of the state is limited accordingly.

History.

(§ 1001 ch 5 ESLA 1955)

Sec. 23.20.370.
Benefits of decedent or incompetent.

Benefits due and payable to a deceased or judicially declared incompetent person shall be paid, in accordance with regulations adopted by the department, to persons in the following order: spouse, child, parent, sister or brother, aunt or uncle, payment to whom the department finds will best carry out the purposes of this chapter.
The regulations need not conform to the statutes applicable to the descent and distribution of decedents’ estates. A receipt from the person to whom the department makes payment fully discharges the fund and the department from liability for the benefits.

History.

(§ 721 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 57 ch 9 SLA 1980)

Sec. 23.20.375.
Filing requirements.

An insured worker is entitled to receive waiting-week credit or benefits for a week of unemployment for which the insured worker has not been disqualified under AS

23.20.360

,

23.20.362

,

23.20.378

—

23.20.387

, or

23.20.505

if, in accordance with regulations adopted by the department, the insured worker has

made an initial claim for benefits; and

for that week, certified for waiting-week credit or made a claim for benefits.

Benefits are not payable for a waiting week and benefits are not payable for a week of unemployment occurring within the benefit year before the completion of the waiting week.

[Repealed, § 80 ch 9 SLA 1980.]

History.

(§ 731 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 9 ch 106 SLA 1971; am § 6 ch 122 SLA 1977; am §§ 58, 80 ch 9 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 114 SLA 1981; am § 11 ch 115 SLA 1982)

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Sec. 23.20.376.
Base period extension and limitation.

If the department finds that during the individual’s base period an individual has been incapable of work during the greater part of the individual’s working time in a calendar quarter, the base period shall be extended a calendar quarter subject to the limitation set out in (b) of this section. The extension of an individual’s base period may not exceed four calendar quarters.

The maximum benefits payable as a result of the use of wages earned in a calendar quarter before the individual’s current base period as defined in AS

23.20.520

shall be reduced by the amount of benefits paid previously as a result of the use of wages in computing a previous benefit determination.

History.

(§ 1 ch 111 SLA 1966)

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Sec. 23.20.378.
Able to work and available for suitable work.

An insured worker is entitled to receive waiting-week credit or benefits for a week of unemployment if for that week the insured worker is able to work and available for suitable work. An insured worker is not considered available for work unless registered for work in accordance with regulations adopted by the department. An insured worker may not be disqualified for failure to comply with this subsection if

the insured worker is not available for work because the insured worker

is ill or disabled;

is traveling to obtain medical services that are not available in the area in which the insured worker resides, or, if a physician determines it is necessary, the insured worker is accompanying a spouse or dependent who is traveling to obtain medical services;

resides in the state and is noncommercially hunting or fishing for personal survival or the survival of dependents;

is serving as a prospective or impaneled juror in a court; or

is attending the funeral of an immediate family member for a period of no longer than seven days; and

a condition described in (1) of this subsection occurs during an uninterrupted period of unemployment immediately following a week for which the insured worker has filed a compensable claim, and work has not been offered that would have been suitable for the insured worker before the illness, disability, hunting, fishing, medical travel, jury service, or funeral attendance.

A waiver of disqualification for an illness or disability under (a)(1) of this section may not exceed six consecutive weeks.

An insured worker is disqualified for waiting-week credit or benefits for a week of unemployment while the insured worker is pursuing an academic education. A disqualification under this subsection begins with the first week of academic instruction and ends with the week immediately before the first full week in which the insured worker is no longer pursuing an academic education. However, an insured worker who has been pursuing an academic education for at least one school term and who was working at least 30 hours a week during a significant portion of the time that the worker was pursuing an academic education is not disqualified for waiting-week credit or benefits under this subsection if the worker’s academic schedule does not preclude full-time work in the worker’s occupation and if the insured worker became unemployed because the worker was laid off or the worker’s job was eliminated. In this subsection,

“pursuing an academic education” means attending an established school in a course of study providing academic instruction of 10 or more credit hours per week, or the equivalent;

“school” includes primary schools, secondary schools, and institutions of higher education.

History.

(§ 59 ch 9 SLA 1980; am § 12 ch 115 SLA 1982; am § 18 ch 100 SLA 1989; am § 12 ch 43 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Sec. 23.20.379.
Voluntary quit, discharge for misconduct, and refusal of work.

An insured worker is disqualified for waiting-week credit or benefits for the first week in which the insured worker is unemployed and for the next five weeks of unemployment following that week if the insured worker

left the insured worker’s last suitable work voluntarily without good cause; or

was discharged for misconduct connected with the insured worker’s last work.

An insured worker is disqualified for waiting-week credit or benefits for a week and the next five weeks of unemployment following that week if, for that week, the insured worker fails without good cause

to apply for available suitable work to which the insured worker was referred by the employment office; or

to accept suitable work when offered to the insured worker.

The department shall reduce the maximum potential benefits to which an insured worker disqualified under this section would have been entitled by three times the insured worker’s weekly benefit amount, excluding the allowance for dependents, or by the amount of unpaid benefits to which the insured worker is entitled, whichever is less.

The disqualification required in (a) and (b) of this section is terminated if the insured worker returns to employment and earns at least eight times the insured worker’s weekly benefit amount.

An insured worker is disqualified for waiting-week credit or benefits for the first week in which the insured worker is unemployed and for the next 51 weeks of unemployment following that week or until the individual has worked subsequent to the discharge from work and earned 20 times the insured worker’s weekly benefit amount in employment covered under this chapter if the insured worker was discharged for commission of a felony or theft in connection with the work. In addition, the insured worker is not eligible for extended benefits under this chapter until the worker has requalified for benefits by meeting the earnings requirement in this subsection.

In this section,

“alcohol” has the meaning given in AS

23.10.699

;

“drugs” has the meaning given in AS

23.10.699

;

“misconduct” includes conduct in violation of an employer’s policy concerning the use of drugs or alcohol, but only if the policy is consistent with AS

23.10.620

.

History.

(§ 59 ch 9 SLA 1980; am §§ 19 — 21 ch 100 SLA 1989; am §§ 3, 4 ch 51 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Sec. 23.20.380.
Disqualification for benefits. [Repealed, § 80 ch 9 SLA 1980.]

Sec. 23.20.381.
Other disqualifications.

Benefits are not payable to any individual on the basis of any services, substantially all of which consist of participation in sports or athletic events or training or preparing to so participate, for any week which commences during the period between two successive seasons or similar periods of that sport or athletic event if that individual performed the services in the first of those seasons or similar periods and there is a reasonable assurance that the individual will perform the same or similar services in the second of those seasons or similar periods.

Benefits are not payable on the basis of services performed by an alien unless that alien is an individual who has been lawfully admitted for permanent residence or otherwise is permanently residing in the United States under color of law, including an alien who is lawfully present in the United States as a result of the application of the provisions of 8 U.S.C. 1153 or 1182 (§§ 203(a)(7) or 212(d)(5), Immigration and Nationality Act).

Benefits may not be refused under (b) of this section unless any data or information required of an individual to determine whether benefits are not payable to the individual because of the individual’s alien status is uniformly required of all applicants for benefits and, in the case of an individual whose applications for benefits would otherwise be approved, determination that benefits to that individual are not payable because of the individual’s alien status are made only upon a preponderance of the evidence in the record.

Notwithstanding the provisions of (b) or (c) of this section, any other conditions which may be required under any amendments to 26 U.S.C. 3304(a)(14) for allowing or denying benefits to aliens as a condition of approval of the unemployment insurance laws of this state under 26 U.S.C. 3304 shall be applied in determining eligibility for benefits under this chapter, commencing on the date on which those conditions are required by federal law to be in effect.

Benefits based on service in an instructional, research, or principal administrative capacity for an educational institution may not be paid to an individual for a week of unemployment which begins during the period between two successive academic years, or during a similar period between two regular terms, whether or not successive, or during a period of paid sabbatical leave provided for in the individual’s contract, if the individual performs services in the first of those academic years or terms and if there is a contract or reasonable assurance that the individual will perform services in the same or similar capacity for an educational institution in the second of those academic years or terms.

[Repealed, § 2 ch 145 SLA 1980.]

An individual may not receive benefits under this chapter in two successive benefit years unless

the individual has performed services, whether or not in “employment” as defined in AS

23.20.525

, after the beginning of the first benefit year; and

the individual has earned wages for those services equal to at least eight times the individual’s weekly benefit amount, excluding an allowance for dependents.

Benefits based on services for an educational institution in other than an instructional, research, or principal administrative capacity may not be paid to an individual for a week of unemployment that begins during the period between two successive academic years or terms if the individual performed those services in the first of those academic years or terms and there is a reasonable assurance that the individual will perform those services in the second of those academic years or terms. If an individual is denied benefits for any week under this subsection and the individual is not later offered an opportunity to perform services for the educational institution in the second academic year or term, the individual is entitled to a retroactive payment of benefits for each week for which the individual filed a timely claim for benefits and for which benefits were denied solely under this subsection.

Benefits based on services described in (e) and (h) of this section may not be paid to an individual for a week that begins during an established and customary vacation period or holiday recess if the individual performs those services in the period immediately before the vacation period recess and there is a reasonable assurance that the individual will perform those services in the period immediately following the vacation period or holiday recess.

Benefits based on services described in (e) and (h) of this section shall be denied under (e), (h), and (i) of this section to an individual who performed those services in an educational institution while in the employ of an educational service agency. In this subsection, “educational service agency” means a governmental agency, governmental entity, or federally recognized tribe that is established and operated exclusively for the purpose of providing services to one or more educational institutions.

History.

(§ 7 ch 122 SLA 1977; am § 60 ch 9 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 145 SLA 1980; am § 13 ch 115 SLA 1982; am § 11 ch 106 SLA 1984; am § 12 ch 27 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and intent in connection with the 2009 amendment of (j) of this section, see § 1, ch. 27, SLA 2009, in the 2009 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective May 26, 2009, added “, or federally recognized tribe” in the second sentence; made related stylistic changes.

Sec. 23.20.382.
Benefits while attending approved vocational training course.

Benefits or waiting-week credit for any week may not be denied an otherwise eligible individual because the individual is attending a vocational training or retraining course with the approval of the director of the employment security division or because, while attending the course, the individual is not available for work or refuses an offer of work.

An otherwise eligible individual may not be denied benefits or waiting-week credit for any week because the individual is in training approved under 19 U.S.C. 2296(a)(1) (sec. 236(a)(1), Trade Act of 1974), if

while attending the training, the individual is not available for work, fails to seek work, or refuses work; or

the individual left work that was not suitable employment to enter training.

In (b)(2) of this section, “suitable employment” means work that

pays at least 80 percent of the individual’s average weekly wage, as determined for the purposes of the Trade Act of 1974; and

is at least equal in skill level to the individual’s past adversely affected employment, as defined for purposes of the Trade Act of 1974.

An otherwise eligible individual may not be denied benefits or waiting-week credit for any week because the individual is in any training approved under P.L. 105-220 (Workforce Investment Act of 1998) and, while attending the training, is not available for work, fails to seek work, or refuses work.

History.

(§ 741.5 ch 5 ESLA 1955, added by § 1 ch 64 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 74 SLA 1976; am § 14 ch 115 SLA 1982; am §§ 22, 23 ch 100 SLA 1989; am § 5 ch 51 SLA 2000; am E.O. No. 118, § 2 (2016))

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2016, ‘‘division responsible for employment and training services’’ was substituted for ‘‘employment security division’’ in (a) to implement E.O. No. 118, Sec. 2.

Cross references. —

For definition of “average weekly wage” in the Trade Act, see 19 U.S.C. § 2319(4); for definition of “adversely affected employment” in the Trade Act, see 19 U.S.C. § 2319(1).

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, by E.O. 118, in (a), substituted ‘‘division responsible for employment and training services’’ for ‘‘employment security division’’. E.O. No. 118, § 4, provides that the 2016 amendment to subsection (a) takes ‘‘effect July 1, 2016.’’ However, E.O. No. 118 was signed by the governor July 28, 2016.

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Legislative history reports. —

For report on ch. 74, SLA 1976 (HB 874 am), see 1976 House Journal, p. 805.

Opinions of attorney general. —

If the entire monthly amount received under Public Law 89-358, §§ 1681, 1682 was expended for subsistence, there was no objection to excluding it for the purpose of computing a claimant’s unemployment insurance benefits. 1966 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 12.

Sec. 23.20.382.
Benefits while attending approved vocational training course.

Benefits or waiting-week credit for any week may not be denied an otherwise eligible individual because the individual is attending a vocational training or retraining course with the approval of the director of the division responsible for employment and training services or because, while attending the course, the individual is not available for work or refuses an offer of work.

An otherwise eligible individual may not be denied benefits or waiting-week credit for any week because the individual is in training approved under 19 U.S.C. 2296(a)(1) (sec. 236(a)(1), Trade Act of 1974), if

while attending the training, the individual is not available for work, fails to seek work, or refuses work; or

the individual left work that was not suitable employment to enter training.

In (b)(2) of this section, “suitable employment” means work that

pays at least 80 percent of the individual’s average weekly wage, as determined for the purposes of the Trade Act of 1974; and

is at least equal in skill level to the individual’s past adversely affected employment, as defined for purposes of the Trade Act of 1974.

An otherwise eligible individual may not be denied benefits or waiting-week credit for any week because the individual is in any training approved under P.L. 105-220 (Workforce Investment Act of 1998) and, while attending the training, is not available for work, fails to seek work, or refuses work.

History.

(§ 741.5 ch 5 ESLA 1955, added by § 1 ch 64 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 74 SLA 1976; am § 14 ch 115 SLA 1982; am §§ 22, 23 ch 100 SLA 1989; am § 5 ch 51 SLA 2000; am E.O. No. 118, § 2 (2016))

Sec. 23.20.383.
Labor dispute disqualification.

An insured worker is disqualified for waiting-week credit or benefits for a week of the insured worker’s unemployment if, for that week, the department finds the insured worker’s unemployment is due to a stoppage of work caused by a labor dispute at the immediate establishment or other premises at which the insured worker is or was last employed. For the purposes of this section, each separate department of the same premises which is commonly conducted as a separate business in separate premises is considered a separate establishment or other premises.

This section does not apply if the department finds that

the insured worker was not participating in or directly interested in the labor dispute that caused the insured worker’s unemployment, and the insured worker did not belong to a grade or class of workers that, immediately before the commencement of the dispute, had members employed at the premises at which the labor dispute occurred who were participating in or directly interested in the labor dispute; or

the labor dispute is caused by the failure or refusal of the employer to comply with an agreement or contract between the employer and the insured worker, or a state or federal law pertaining to hours, wages, or other conditions of work.

History.

(§ 61 ch 9 SLA 1980; am § 15 ch 115 SLA 1982)

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Sec. 23.20.385.
Suitable work.

Work may not be considered suitable and benefits may not be denied under a provision of this chapter to an otherwise eligible individual for refusing to accept new work under any of the following conditions:

if the position offered is vacant due directly to a strike, lockout, or other labor dispute;

if the wages, hours, or other conditions of the work offered are substantially less favorable to the individual than those prevailing for similar work in the locality;

if, as a condition of being employed, the individual would be required to join a company union or to resign from or refrain from joining a bona fide labor organization.

In determining whether work is suitable for a claimant and in determining the existence of good cause for leaving or refusing work, the department shall, in addition to determining the existence of any of the conditions specified in (a) of this section, consider the degree of risk to the claimant’s health, safety, and morals, the claimant’s physical fitness for the work, the claimant’s prior training, experience, and earnings, the length of the claimant’s unemployment, the prospects for obtaining work at the claimant’s highest skill, the distance of the available work from the claimant’s residence, the prospects for obtaining local work, and other factors that influence a reasonably prudent person in the claimant’s circumstances.

This section shall be given the same meaning as the Secretary of Labor gives to 26 U.S.C. 3304(a)(5) (Internal Revenue Code of 1954).

History.

(§ 742 ch 5 ESLA 1955)

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.